Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-819
Seized property; transfer to another jurisdiction; when.

Where seized property is no longer required as evidence in the prosecution of any complaint or information the court which has jurisdiction of such property may transfer the same to the jurisdiction of any other court, including courts of another state or federal courts, where it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that such property is required as evidence in any prosecution in such other court.

Laws 1963, c. 161, § 8, p. 574.

A harmonious reading of this section and section 29-818 is that references to jurisdiction in each are to jurisdiction over seized property, not subject matter jurisdiction. Huff v. Otto, 28 Neb. App. 646, 947 N.W.2d 343 (2020).